Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 3
REGISTRATION OF SECURITIES
AND EXEMPTIONS

11-51-301. Requirement for registration of securities.

It is unlawful for any person to offer to sell or sell any security in this state unless it is registered under this article 51; the security or transaction is exempted under section 11-51-307, 11-51-308, 11-51-308.5, or 11-51-309; or the security is a federal covered security for which a notice filing has been made pursuant to section 11-51-304.5.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 707, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 757, § 18, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1388), ch. 280, p. 1755, § 1, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-107 (1) as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the applicability of this section, see § 11-51-102 (1) and (7). For securities exempted from this section, see § 11-51-307.

11-51-302. General registration provisions.

A registration statement may be filed by the issuer, any other person on whose behalf the offering is to be made, or a broker-dealer licensed or exempt under this article.

Every registration statement filed under section 11-51-303 or 11-51-304 shall be accompanied by a registration fee, which shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 11-51-707.

Any document or portion thereof filed with the securities commissioner under this article or a predecessor law within five years preceding the filing of a registration statement may be incorporated by reference in a registration statement to the extent that such document or portion thereof is accurate at the time of such incorporation by reference.

The securities commissioner may, by rule or order, permit the omission of any item of information or document from any registration statement.

The securities commissioner may, by rule or order, require as a condition of registration under section 11-51-304 that the proceeds from the sale of the registered security be held in escrow until the issuer receives a specified amount. The securities commissioner may, by rule or order, determine the conditions of any escrow required under this subsection (5), but the securities commissioner may not reject a depository solely because of its location in another state. Improper release by a depository of such escrow in violation of this subsection (5) is punishable pursuant to section 11-51-603 (2).

In the case of any offering registered under section 11-51-303 or 11-51-304 where less than seventy-five percent of the net proceeds from the sale of the registered securities are committed for use in one or more specific lines of business, eighty percent of the net proceeds received by the issuer shall be placed into escrow until:

The completion of a transaction or series of transactions whereby at least fifty percent of the gross proceeds received from the sale of registered securities (including any amounts actually received by the issuer upon exercise of registered warrants or rights to purchase or subscribe to another security) are committed for use in one or more specific lines of business; and

The lapse of no more than ten days after receipt by the securities commissioner of notice of the proposed release of funds from such escrow.

Such notice must contain the information and be in the form the securities commissioner by rule requires. If an escrow is released and warrants or rights which were once registered remain outstanding, then this subsection (6) shall apply separately to the proceeds from any subsequent exercise of such warrants or rights. Proceeds received from the exercise of such warrants or rights shall then be subject to release upon the conditions stated in this subsection (6), and this subsection (6) shall then each time apply separately with respect to proceeds from the exercise of warrants or rights which were once registered and still remain outstanding. The securities commissioner may, by rule or order, determine the conditions of any escrow required under this subsection (6), but the securities commissioner may not reject a depository solely because of its location in another state. Improper release by a depository of such escrow in violation of this subsection (6) is punishable pursuant to section 11-51-603 (2). The securities commissioner may, by rule or order, waive the requirements of this subsection (6), in whole or in part, with respect to any class of registrations or any specific registration if the securities commissioner finds that such waiver is in the public interest and that compliance with the requirements of this subsection (6) is not necessary for the protection of investors.

A registration statement filed and effective under section 11-51-303 is effective for one year after its effective date and thereafter is effective during the period or periods, but only those periods, when the prospectus contained in the registration statement filed under the federal "Securities Act of 1933", as amended, meets the requirements of section 10 (a) of the federal "Securities Act of 1933", as amended, 15 U.S.C. sec. 77j (a).

Repealed.

A registration statement filed and effective under section 11-51-304 is effective for one year after its effective date unless the securities commissioner by rule or order extends the period of effectiveness.

A registration statement effective under section 11-51-303 or 11-51-304 may be terminated or withdrawn upon the request of the issuer or the person who filed the registration statement and with the consent of the securities commissioner.

All outstanding securities of the same class as a registered security are considered to be registered for the purpose of a nonissuer transaction or series of transactions while the registration statement is effective.

So long as a registration statement under section 11-51-304 is effective, the securities commissioner may, by rule or order, require the person who filed the registration statement to file reports, not more often than quarterly, to keep reasonably current the information contained in the registration statement and to disclose the progress of the offering.

A registration statement under section 11-51-303 or 11-51-304 may be amended after its effective date so as to increase the quantity of securities specified as being offered. Every person filing such an amendment shall pay a registration fee, which shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 11-51-707, with respect to the additional securities being registered. Such an amendment becomes effective when the securities commissioner so orders. If the additional securities being registered have been sold before such amendment is filed and the person filing the amendment provides such information as the securities commissioner may request to show that the failure to register the additional securities prior to their sale was in good faith and not for the purpose of avoiding compliance with this article, the securities commissioner may by order provide that the effectiveness of the amendment shall relate back to the first date of sale of the additional securities.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 707, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(7) amended, p. 1838, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(7)(a) amended and (7)(b) repealed, (HB 18-1388), ch. 280, p. 1755, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-108 as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the "Securities Act of 1933", see Pub.L. 73-22, codified at 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.

11-51-303. Registration by coordination.

Securities for which a registration statement has been filed under the federal "Securities Act of 1933" or any securities for which filings have been made pursuant to the security and exchange commission's regulation A, promulgated pursuant to section 3(b) of the federal "Securities Act of 1933", in connection with the offering of the securities may be registered by coordination. A registration statement and accompanying records shall be filed with the securities commissioner pursuant to this section and must contain the following information and be accompanied by the consent to service of process required by section

11-51-706

:

A copy of the latest form of prospectus, offering circular, or letter of notification filed under the federal "Securities Act of 1933";

A current copy of the issuer's articles of incorporation and bylaws or, if so determined by the securities commissioner, the substantial equivalent of the issuer's articles of incorporation and bylaws;

A copy of any agreement with or among the underwriters of the security to be registered;

A copy of any indenture or other instrument governing the issuance of the security to be registered;

A specimen, copy, or description of the security that is required by rule promulgated by the securities commissioner or order issued pursuant to this article; and

A copy of other information or records filed by the issuer under the federal "Securities Act of 1933" that the securities commissioner may request.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 512, 1, effective July 1, 2004.)

Any amendments to the federal prospectus, offering circular, or letter of notification shall be promptly filed with the securities commissioner after the amended prospectus or other filing is filed with the federal securities and exchange commission; except that an amendment to the prospectus that only delays the effective date of the registration statement shall not be filed with the securities commissioner.

A registration statement or other filing required to be filed with the securities commissioner pursuant to this section shall be considered effective simultaneously with or subsequent to the federal registration statement or other filing when all of the following conditions are satisfied:

A stop order under subsection (4) of this section or section 11-51-306, or issued by the federal securities and exchange commission, is not in effect and a proceeding is not pending against the issuer under section 11-51-410; and

The registration statement or other filing has been on file with the securities commissioner for at least twenty days; except that the securities commissioner may establish, by rule or order, a period less than twenty days.

The registrant shall promptly notify the securities commissioner of the date when the federal registration statement or other filing becomes effective and the content of any price amendment. The registrant shall promptly file the notice containing the price amendment with the securities commissioner. If the notice is not timely received, the securities commissioner may, without prior notice or hearing, issue a stop order, which retroactively denies the effectiveness of a registration statement or suspends the effectiveness of the registration statement until the registrant complies with this section. The securities commissioner shall promptly notify the registrant of a stop order by telephone or electronic means and be able to confirm that notice of the stop order was given to the registrant. If the registrant subsequently complies with the notice requirements of this section, the stop order becomes void as of the date of its issuance.

If the federal registration statement or other federal filing becomes effective before all of the conditions of this section are satisfied, or if a condition of this section is waived by the securities commissioner, the registration statement or other filing becomes effective when all of the conditions of this section are either satisfied or waived by the securities commissioner. If the registrant notifies the securities commissioner of the date when the federal registration statement or other federal filing is expected to become effective, the securities commissioner shall promptly notify the registrant by telephone or electronic means whether all of the conditions of this section have been satisfied by the registrant or the securities commissioner is waiving one or all of the conditions. The securities commissioner shall also notify the registrant if the securities commissioner intends to institute a proceeding against the registrant pursuant to section 11-51-306 and be able to confirm that such notice was provided to the registrant. Failure of the securities commissioner to notify the registrant of the securities commissioner's intent to institute an action pursuant to section 11-51-306 does not invalidate or preclude the institution of such action.

The commissioner shall promulgate a rule that defines the prompt filing and notification provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 709, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 512, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-104), ch. 177, p. 576, § 4, effective May 11.

Cross references:

For the "Securities Act of 1933", see Pub.L. 73-22, codified at 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.; for the Security and Exchange Commission's regulation A, see 17 CFR 230.251 to 17 CFR 230.263.

11-51-304. Registration by qualification.

A security may be registered by qualification.

A registration statement under this section shall contain full and fair disclosure of all material facts respecting the investment offered, including the following information, shall state the title of the security and the number or amount being registered under this article, and shall be accompanied by the following documents in addition to the consent to service of process required by section 11-51-706:

With respect to the issuer, its name, address, and form of organization; the state or foreign jurisdiction and date of its organization; the general character and location of its business; a description of its physical properties and equipment; and a statement of the general competitive conditions in the industry or business in which it is or will be engaged;

With respect to every director and officer of the issuer, or person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, the name, address, and principal occupation for the past five years; the amount of securities of the issuer held as of a specified date within thirty days of the filing of the registration statement; the amount of the securities covered by the registration statement to which the person has indicated an intention to subscribe; and a description of any material interest in any material transaction with the issuer or any significant subsidiary effected within the past three years or proposed to be effected;

With respect to persons covered by paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the remuneration paid during the past twelve months and estimated to be paid during the next twelve months, directly or indirectly, by the issuer (together with all predecessors, parents, subsidiaries, and affiliates) to all such persons in the aggregate;

With respect to any person owning of record, or beneficially if known, ten percent or more of the outstanding shares of any class of equity security of the issuer, the information specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) other than the occupation;

With respect to every promoter, if the issuer was organized within the past three years, the information specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), any amount paid within that period or intended to be paid to that person, and the consideration for any such payment;

With respect to any person on whose behalf any part of the offering is to be made in a nonissuer distribution, the name and address, the amount of securities of the issuer held as of the date of the filing of the registration statement, a description of any material interest in any material transaction with the issuer or any significant subsidiary effected within the past three years or proposed to be effected, and a statement of the person's reasons for making the offering;

The capitalization and long-term debt on both a current and pro forma basis of the issuer, including a description of each security outstanding or being registered or otherwise offered, and a statement of the amount and kind of consideration whether in the form of cash, physical assets, services, patents, goodwill, or anything else for which the issuer or any subsidiary has issued any of its securities within the past two years or is obligated to issue any of its securities;

The kind and amount of securities to be offered; the proposed offering price or the method by which it is to be computed; any variation therefrom at which any proportion is to be made to any person or class of persons, other than the underwriters, with a specification of any such person or class; the basis upon which the offering is to be made if otherwise than for cash; the estimated aggregate underwriting and selling discounts or commissions and finders' fees including separately cash, securities, contracts, or anything else of value to accrue to the underwriters or finders in connection with the offering or, if the selling discounts or commissions are variable, the basis of determining them and their maximum and minimum amounts; the estimated amounts of other selling expenses, including legal, engineering, and accounting charges; the name and address of every underwriter and every recipient of a finder's fee; a copy of any underwriting or selling group agreement pursuant to which the distribution is to be made, or the proposed form of any such agreement whose terms have not yet been determined; and a description of the plan of distribution of any securities which are to be offered otherwise than through an underwriter;

The estimated cash proceeds to be received by the issuer from the offering; the purposes for which the proceeds are to be used by the issuer; the amount to be used for each purpose; the order or priority in which the proceeds will be used for the purposes stated; and the amounts of any funds to be raised; and, if any part of the proceeds is to be used to acquire any property including goodwill otherwise than in the ordinary course of business, the names and addresses of the vendors, the purchase price, and the names of any persons who have received commissions in connection with the acquisition, and the amounts of any such commissions and any other expenses in connection with the acquisition including the cost of borrowing money to finance the acquisition;

A description of any stock options or other security options outstanding or to be created in connection with the offering, together with the amount of any such options held or to be held by every person required to be named in paragraph (b), (d), (e), (f), or (h) of this subsection (2) and by any person who holds or will hold ten percent or more in the aggregate of any such options;

The date of, parties to, and general effect concisely stated of every management or other material contract made or to be made otherwise than in the ordinary course of business if it is to be performed in whole or in part at or after the filing of the registration statement or was made within the past two years, together with a copy of every such contract, and a description of any pending litigation or proceeding to which the issuer is a party and which materially affects its business or assets including any litigation or proceeding known to be contemplated by governmental authorities;

A copy of any prospectus, pamphlet, circular, form letter, advertisement, or other sales literature intended as of its effective date to be used in connection with the offering;

A specimen or copy of the security being registered, a copy of the issuer's articles of incorporation and bylaws, or their substantial equivalents, as currently in effect, and a copy of any indenture or other instrument covering the security to be registered;

A signed or conformed copy of an opinion of counsel as to the legality of the security being registered, which shall state whether the security when sold will be legally issued, fully paid, and nonassessable and, if a debt security, a binding obligation of the issuer;

The written consent of any accountant, engineer, appraiser, or other person whose profession gives authority to a statement made by him, if any such person is named as having prepared or certified a report or valuation other than a public and official document or statement which is used in connection with the registration statement;

The balance sheet of the issuer as of a date within four months prior to the filing of the registration statement; a profit and loss statement and analysis of surplus for each of the three fiscal years preceding the date of the balance sheet and for any period between the close of the last fiscal year and the date of the balance sheet, or for the period of the issuer's and any predecessor's existence if less than three years; and, if any part of the proceeds of the offering is to be applied to the purchase of any business, the same financial statements which would be required if that business were the registrant; and

Such additional information as the securities commissioner requires by rule or order and as is required for full and fair disclosure respecting the investment offered.

A registration statement under this section becomes effective when the securities commissioner so orders or twenty-eight calendar days from the date of filing if the securities commissioner does not request changes in the registration statement or if the registration statement is not subject to a stop order under section 11-51-306.

The securities commissioner may, by rule or order, require as a condition of registration under this section that an offering circular containing any designated part of the information specified in subsection (2) of this section be sent or given to each person to whom an offer is made before or concurrently with: The first written offer made to such person otherwise than by means of a public advertisement by or for the account of the issuer or any other person on whose behalf the offering is being made or by any broker-dealer or underwriter who is offering part of an unsold allotment or subscription taken as a participant in the distribution; the confirmation of any sale made by or for the account of any person; or a payment made pursuant to any such sale or the delivery of the security pursuant to any such sale, whichever first occurs.

The date of filing shall be the date that the registration statement or an amendment to the registration statement is received by the securities commissioner.

The securities commissioner shall by rule prescribe a limited offering registration procedure for any offering of securities by an issuer if the issuer has its principal office and the majority of its full-time employees in Colorado; if the issuer provides in its offering document that at least eighty percent of the net proceeds from the offering will be used in connection with the operations of such issuer in this state; if the gross proceeds from such offering of securities and any other offering of securities will not exceed five million dollars within any twelve-month period; and if the registration statement and offering documents for such limited offering contain the following:

With respect to the issuer, its principal business address, and its form, state or foreign jurisdiction, and date of its organization;

The general character and location of its business and a description of its physical properties and equipment;

The name and address of every officer and director of the issuer and of every person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, and for each such person, a brief description of their business experience within the last five years, a description of any transaction during the preceding year or any proposed transaction between any such persons and the issuer, and a description of any of the following events occurring within the last five years that are material to an evaluation of the offering:

The filing of a petition in bankruptcy by or against, or the filing of a receivership action against, any such person personally or by or against any entity for which they served as officer, director, or in a similar status or function;

Any conviction of any such person in a criminal proceeding, or the filing of any indictment, information, or criminal complaint against any such person (excluding traffic violations and other minor offenses); and

Any order, judgment, or decree, not subsequently reversed, suspended, or vacated, against any such person entered by a court of competent jurisdiction or any federal or state regulatory authority involving the violation by such person of any federal or state securities law or in connection with any matter material to the offering, the issuer, or its business;

The principal factors contributing to the risks of the enterprise, including, when applicable, the absence of an operating history of the issuer, the absence of profitable operations in recent periods, the nature of the business or proposed business in which the issuer will engage, and the absence of any previous market for the securities of the issuer;

The amount of authorized and issued securities of the issuer;

The kind and amount of securities to be offered, the proposed offering price, and the minimum and maximum amounts that will be raised in the offering;

The name, address, and amount of compensation of any underwriter or broker-dealer to receive compensation in connection with the offering;

The estimated proceeds to be received by the issuer from the offering and the purposes for which such proceeds are to be used;

An unaudited balance sheet as of a date within four months of the filing of the registration statement and an unaudited profit and loss statement and analysis of surplus for the most recent fiscal year of the issuer and for any period between the close of the last fiscal year and the date of the balance sheet, or for the period of the issuer's existence if less than one year; and

The following legend prominently stated on the cover page of the offering document:

In the case of a registration by qualification under subsection (6) of this section, the securities commissioner may not require as a condition of registration under section 11-51-302 (5) that any of the gross proceeds from the sale of the registered security be held in escrow in the case of an offering underwritten by a broker-dealer registered under the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934", or that more than thirty-five percent of the gross proceeds from the sale of the registered security be held in escrow in the case of an offering not underwritten by such a broker-dealer.

A registration statement under subsection (6) of this section becomes effective when the securities commissioner so orders or fourteen calendar days from the date of the filing if the securities commissioner does not request changes in the registration statement or if the registration statement is not subject to a stop order under section 11-51-306.

THESE SECURITIES ARE OFFERED PURSUANT TO A LIMITED OFFERING REGISTRATION WITH THE COLORADO DIVISION OF SECURITIES. THESE SECURITIES HAVE NOT BEEN APPROVED OR DISAPPROVED BY THE COLORADO DIVISION OF SECURITIES NOR HAS THE DIVISION PASSED UPON THE ACCURACY OR ADEQUACY OF THIS OFFERING DOCUMENT. ANY REPRESENTATION TO THE CONTRARY IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE.
THE STATE OF COLORADO HAS INSTITUTED THIS LIMITED OFFERING REGISTRATION PROCEDURE IN AN EFFORT TO SIMPLIFY AND EXPEDITE THE SMALL BUSINESS CAPITAL FORMATION PROCESS. INVESTORS ARE ENCOURAGED TO ASK QUESTIONS OF AND SEEK ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FROM THE ISSUER AND UNDERWRITER OF THESE SECURITIES.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 710, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

IP(6) amended, (HB 14-1079), ch. 72, p. 302, § 1, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-109 as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the "Securities Exchange Act of 1934", see Pub.L. 73-291, codified at 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.

11-51-304.5. Notice filing - investment companies.

With respect to a security that is a federal covered security as defined in section 18 (b)(2) of the federal "Securities Act of 1933", as amended, 15 U.S.C. sec. 77r (b)(2), that is not otherwise exempt under section 11-51-307, 11-51-308, 11-51-308.5, or 11-51-309, before the initial offer of the security, the issuer must file with the securities commissioner a form NF established by the North American Securities Administrators Association, or an analogous form prescribed by the securities commissioner, along with a notice filing fee, which fee shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 11-51-707.

A notice filing under this section is effective only for securities sold within twelve months after the date on which the form NF was filed with the securities commissioner. On or before the expiration date, the issuer may renew a notice filing by filing another form NF and paying a renewal fee, which fee shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 11-51-707. The renewed notice filing becomes effective upon the expiration of the filing being renewed.

If the securities commissioner finds there is a failure to comply with a notice filing or fee requirement of this section, the securities commissioner may issue a stop order suspending the offer or sale of those securities for which notice filing has not been made or the notice filing fee has not been paid. If the securities commissioner finds that a deficiency is corrected, the stop order is void and no penalty will be imposed.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1388), ch. 280, p. 1756, § 3, effective August 8.

11-51-305. Filing of sales literature.

The securities commissioner may, by rule or order, require the filing of any prospectus, pamphlet, circular, form letter, advertisement, or other sales literature addressed or intended for distribution to prospective investors, unless:

The security or the transaction is exempted by section 11-51-307, 11-51-308, or 11-51-309; or

The security is subject to the filing requirements of section 11-51-304.5.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 714, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1388), ch. 280, p. 1756, § 4, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-114 as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For securities exempted from this section, see § 11-51-307.

11-51-306. Denial, suspension, or revocation of registration.

The securities commissioner may issue a stop order denying effectiveness to, or suspending or revoking the effectiveness of, any registration statement, if the securities commissioner finds violations of the escrow provisions in section 11-51-302 (5) or (6), or, in the case of any registration statement under section 11-51-304, if the securities commissioner finds that the order is in the public interest and that any one of the following grounds exists:

The registration statement as of its effective date or as of any earlier date in the case of an order denying effectiveness, any amendment under section 11-51-302 (9) as of its effective date, or any report under section 11-51-302 (8) contains any false or misleading statement in violation of section 11-51-502;

Any provision of this article or any rule, order, or condition imposed under this article has been violated, in connection with the offering, by the issuer, any partner, officer, or director of the issuer, any person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, or any person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by the issuer. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the securities commissioner shall not issue any stop order denying effectiveness to, or suspending or revoking the effectiveness of, any registration statement on the grounds that the offering, when viewed on its merits as an investment, is unfair, unjust, or inequitable.

The security registered or sought to be registered is the subject of an administrative stop order or similar order or a permanent or temporary injunction of any court of competent jurisdiction entered under any other federal or state law applicable to the offering; but the securities commissioner may not institute a proceeding against an effective registration statement under this paragraph (c) more than one year from the date of the order or injunction relied on, and the securities commissioner may not enter an order under this paragraph (c) on the basis of an order or injunction entered under any other state law unless that order or injunction was based on facts which would currently constitute a ground for a stop order under this section; or

The issuer's enterprise or method of business includes or would include activities which are illegal where performed.

(1.5) With respect to a security sought to be registered pursuant to section 11-51-303, the securities commissioner may issue a stop order denying effectiveness to, or suspending or revoking the effectiveness of, any registration statement if the securities commissioner finds that there has been a failure to comply with section 11-51-303 (2).

The securities commissioner may, by summary order under section 11-51-606 (3)(a), summarily postpone or suspend the effectiveness of a registration statement pending final determination of any proceeding under this section.

No stop order may be entered under this section, except under subsection (2) of this section, without the provision to the issuer of an appropriate prior notice, an opportunity for a hearing, and written findings of fact and conclusions of law.

The securities commissioner may vacate or modify a stop order if the securities commissioner finds that the conditions which prompted its entry have changed or that it is otherwise in the public interest to do so.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 714, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1839, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1.5) added, p. 514, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-112 as it existed prior to 1990.

11-51-307. Exempt securities.

The following securities are exempted from sections 11-51-301 and 11-51-305:

Any security (including a revenue obligation) issued or guaranteed by the United States, any state, any political subdivision of a state, or any agency or corporate or other instrumentality of one or more of any of them or any certificate of deposit for any of them;

Any security issued or guaranteed by Canada, any Canadian province, any political subdivision of any such province, any agency or corporate or other instrumentality of one or more of any of them, or any other foreign government with which the United States currently maintains diplomatic relations, if the security is recognized as a valid obligation by the issuer or guarantor;

Any security issued by and representing an interest in or a debt of, or guaranteed by, any depository institution organized under the laws of the United States or any depository institution organized and supervised under the laws of any state;

Any security issued or guaranteed by any federal credit union or any credit union, industrial loan association, or similar association organized and supervised under the laws of this state;

Any security issued or guaranteed by any railroad, other common carrier, public utility, or holding company which is: Subject to the jurisdiction of the surface transportation board; a registered holding company under the federal "Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935" or a subsidiary of such a company within the meaning of that act; or regulated in respect of its issuance or guarantee of the security by a governmental authority of the United States, any state, Canada, or any Canadian province;

Any security listed or approved for listing upon notice of issuance on any national securities exchange registered under the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934", 15 U.S.C. sec. 78f, as amended, or any other security of the same issuer that is of a senior or substantially equal rank; any security called for by subscription rights or warrants so listed, designated, or approved; or any warrant or right to purchase or subscribe to any of them;

Any security which is issued by any person organized and operated not for private profit but exclusively for religious, educational, benevolent, or charitable purposes or as a chamber of commerce or trade or professional association and which is offered or sold to a bona fide constituent or member of such organization or association, if no direct or indirect commission or remuneration is paid in connection with the offer or sale of such security except to a licensed broker-dealer; or any security which is issued by any cooperative association engaged in the sale or production of electricity and regulated by the public utilities commission of this state;

Any commercial paper which arises out of a current transaction or the proceeds of which have been or are to be used for current transactions and which evidences an obligation to pay cash within nine months of the date of issuance, exclusive of days of grace, or any renewal of such paper which is likewise limited, or any guarantee of such paper or of any such renewal;

Any security issued in connection with an employee's stock purchase, savings, pension, profit-sharing, or similar benefit plan; and

Any security issued by a cooperative association as defined in article 55 of title 7, C.R.S.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 715, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(e) amended, p. 1267, § 7, effective June 5.

L. 2008:

(1)(f) amended, p. 21, § 10, effective August 5.

L. 2018:

(1)(k) and (2) repealed, (HB 18-1388), ch. 280, p. 1756, § 5, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-51-113 as it existed prior to 1990.

Cross references:

For the "Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935", see Pub.L. 74-333, codified at 15 U.S.C. § 79 et seq.